District of Columbia statutes.
3-1331

License suspension or revocation.

Any license granted under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to the regulations set forth by the Board and shall be subject to suspension or revocation for good cause, after giving the licensee a reasonable opportunity for a hearing, at which he shall have the right to be represented by counsel. If any license is suspended or revoked, the Board shall state the reasons for such suspension or revocation and cause an entry of such reasons to be made on the record books of the Board. Any licensee aggrieved by the action of the Board may appeal therefrom to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia within 30 days of the final decision of the Board.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736
1981 Ed., § 2-2531.